Louisiana, session 2026, HB1167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The elevated portion of Louisiana Highway 433 from Dubee Pena Road
to Rivet Drive in the city of Slidell, Louisiana, parish of St. Tammany, shall be known and
is hereby designated as the "Emile 'Uncle Tobe' Galatas Memorial Bridge".
Section 2. The portion of United States Highway 11 from the Dr. T.J. Smith, Sr.
Expressway to Louisiana Highway 41 in the city of Pearl River, Louisiana, parish of St.
Tammany, shall be known and is hereby designated the "Captain Steven Gaudet, Jr.
Memorial Highway".
Section 3. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting these designations
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign for the "Emile 'Uncle Tobe' Galatas
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 1167 ENROLLED
Memorial Bridge" and the sum of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign for the
"Captain Steven Gaudet, Jr. Memorial Highway".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2